Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-510 Effectiveness of filed record.
(a) A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a
person that may file it under section 490:9-509.

(b) A record authorized by one secured party
of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another
secured party of record.

(c) A continuation statement that is not filed
within the six-month period prescribed by section 490:9-515(d) is ineffective.
[L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next